Arkansas statutes. Title 2 Agriculture
Chapter 25

Arkansas Grain Grading Act

2-25-101. Title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Arkansas Grain Grading Act”.

History.

Acts 2019, No. 795, § 1.

2-25-102. Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Grain” means corn, soybeans, and wheat;

“Grain dealer” means a person or entity that receives grain from a grain producer and sells or distributes grain commercially;

“Official grading agency” means an agency or laboratory authorized by the United States Agricultural Marketing Service to provide official inspection and weighing services on behalf of the United States Agricultural Marketing Service; and

“Producer” means a farmer who grows grain and delivers grain to a grain dealer.

History.

Acts 2019, No. 795, § 1.

2-25-103. Administration.

The Department of Agriculture shall adopt rules governing the standards for sampling and grading grain that are consistent with the standards for sampling and grading grain developed by the United States Department of Agriculture.

The Department of Agriculture shall certify:

Grain dealers that employ grain samplers and graders; and

Courses of instruction in the methods of sampling and grading grain.

The Department of Agriculture shall issue a certificate to a grain dealer who conducts a course of instruction for sampling and grading grain that is satisfactory to the Department of Agriculture.

A grain dealer who issues grades for grain shall:

Sample and grade each load of grain delivered by a producer within twenty-four (24) hours of the time the grain is delivered to the grain dealer; and

Retain each sample of grain received from a producer that is subject to excessive deductions for grain damage or foreign material.

The Department of Agriculture shall promulgate a rule regarding the level of deduction that is excessive for each type of grain.

The rule shall:

Include the deductions for grain damage or foreign material;

Be based upon the numerical grades determined for each type of grain by the United States Department of Agriculture; and

Include a provision allowing for variance in the moisture level of a sample, which shall not subject the sample to reinspection.

Samples of grain that are subject to excessive deductions shall be retained in separate containers for two (2) days from the date the sample was graded.

[Reserved.]

are hereby classified as alternate livestock.

Cited: Phillips v. Town of Oak Grove, 333 Ark. 183, 968 S.W.2d 600 (1998).

Effective Dates. Acts 2015, No. 1169, § 3: Emergency clause failed to pass. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that agriculture is an essential element of Arkansas's economy; that protecting the members of the agricultural community in Arkansas is in the best interests of the state; that the failure of some contractors to notify growers in advance that additional investments may be required under a production contract has resulted in some growers being forced to close their businesses; and that this act is immediately necessary because the unexpected closure of these businesses is harmful to the state's agricultural community and overall economy. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

“Contractor” shall have its common meaning within the industry and shall include a person or entity who owns livestock or poultry, or both, that are raised or cared for by a grower;

“Grower” shall have its common meaning within the industry and shall include a person engaged in the business of raising and caring for livestock or poultry, or both, in accordance with a production contract, marketing agreement, or other arrangement under which a person raises and cares for livestock or poultry, or both, whether the livestock and poultry are owned by the person or by another person or entity;

“Material risk” means:

The duration of the production contract;

The conditions for the termination of the production contract before the designated expiration of the production contract; and

The terms relating to payment to be made to the grower, including, when applicable:

The party liable for condemnations;

The method for figuring feed conversion ratios;

The method used to convert condemnations to live weight;

The per-unit charges for feed and other inputs furnished by the contractor; and

The factors to be used when grouping or ranking growers;

“Production” shall have its common meaning within the industry and shall include raising and caring for livestock or poultry, or both, for processing for human consumption under the terms of a production contract; and

“Production contract” shall have its common meaning within the industry and shall include any written agreement that provides for the raising and care of livestock or poultry, or both, by a grower for processing for human consumption for a contractor.

If after a dispute arises, all parties to the production contract agree, then a dispute arising under the contract may be submitted to arbitration; and

Contain certain disclosure notices, including without limitation:

The notices required under 7 U.S.C. § 197a, as it existed on January 1, 2015; and

Notice that the grower's execution of the production contract establishes that the grower understands and acknowledges that additional large capital investments, including without limitation the purchase of additional equipment, the completion of improvements, and the upgrade of structures housing poultry or livestock, may be required of the grower during the term of the production contract.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment, in (b)(1), deleted “shall” preceding “be accompanied” and inserted “signed by the grower”; in (b)(5)(A), substituted “a party” for “any party” and “a court” for “any court”; substituted “a” for “any” preceding “dispute arising” in (b)(5)(B); added (b)(6); and substituted “A production contract or a” for “Any” in (c)(1).

(1)A production contract or a provision of a production contract that violates a provision of subsection (b) of this section is void and unenforceable.

(1)A grower who suffers damages because of a contractor's violation of a provision of subsection (b) of this section may obtain appropriate legal and equitable relief, including, but not limited to, injunctive relief and any damages allowable by Arkansas law.

This section applies to a production contract entered into on or after September 1, 2005.

(1)It is found and determined by the General Assembly that:

The Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission has been authorized by the United States Department of Agriculture to develop and administer a voluntary equine identification system; and

Embedding a chip for the purpose of identifying an animal can endanger the animal if not properly injected and placed.

Therefore, it is the purpose of this section to establish criteria for persons engaged in the voluntary embedding of chips for equine identification.

The commission shall promulgate rules setting forth training requirements for the voluntary embedding or injecting a chip for purpose of animal identification.

The commission shall administer training and provide certification upon satisfactory completion.

The commission shall establish a fine for failure to obtain proper certification before embedding or injecting a chip for the purpose of equine animal identification.

History.

Acts 2019, No. 795, § 1.

2-25-104. Disputes.

If a dispute arises regarding the grading of a sample that is subject to excessive deductions, the grain dealer or the producer, or both, may request that the sample be regraded by an official grading agency for an official grade that shall be deemed the official grade of the disputed sample.

If a regrading is requested, the grain dealer shall provide the sample to the official grading agency at the requester's expense.

History.

Acts 2019, No. 795, § 1.

2-25-105. Enforcement.

An employee of the Department of Agriculture may inspect randomly selected grain dealers to ensure the grain dealer is certified by the department for sampling and grading grain.

An employee of the grain dealer that is responsible for sampling and grading grain is required to demonstrate through skill an adequate knowledge of sampling and grading grain as determined by the department.

History.

Acts 2019, No. 795, § 1.

2-25-106. Penalties.

If the Department of Agriculture conducts an inspection of a grain dealer as permitted under §2-25-105(a) and determines that a grain dealer who issues grades is not taking samples of graded grain in a manner consistent with the standards adopted by the department, the department may place the grain dealer on probation.

(1)If a grain dealer who issues grades for grain is placed on probation, an employee of an official grading agency may inspect randomly selected samples of graded grain to determine whether the grain dealer is taking samples and grading grain in a manner consistent with the rules adopted by the department.

The samples of graded grain shall be obtained and an inspection performed during the normal working hours of the grain dealer.

The grain dealer shall pay for the samples of graded grain that are inspected.

History.

Acts 2019, No. 795, § 1.

Chapters 26-31